District of Columbia statutes.
21-2106

Construction of power relating to stock and bond transactions.

In a statutory power of attorney the language granting power with respect to stock and bond transactions empowers the agent to buy, sell, and exchange stocks, bonds, mutual funds, and all other types of securities and financial instruments, except commodity futures contracts, and call and put options on stocks and stock indexes, receive certificates, and other evidences of ownership with respect to securities, exercise voting rights with respect to securities in person or by proxy, enter into voting trusts, and consent to limitations on the right to vote.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-147, § 2, 45 DCR 3853
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.
1981 Ed., § 21-2106.